Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2524
Sections; how construed.

Nothing in sections 25-1140.09, 28-303, 28-313, and 29-2519 to 29-2546 shall be in any way deemed to repeal or limit existing procedures for automatic review of capital cases, nor shall they in any way limit the right of the Supreme Court to reduce a sentence of death to a sentence of life imprisonment in accordance with the provisions of section 29-2308, nor shall they limit the right of the Board of Pardons to commute any sentence of death to a sentence of life imprisonment.

Laws 1973, LB 268, § 9;

Laws 1978, LB 748, § 23;

Laws 1978, LB 711, § 6;

Laws 2002, Third Spec. Sess., LB 1 § 16;

Laws 2011, LB12, § 5;

Laws 2015, LB268, § 35;

Referendum 2016, No. 426.
The repeal of section 29-2524 by Laws 2015, LB 268, section 35, is not effective because of the vote on the referendum at the November 2016 general election.
Constitutional provisions:

Board of Pardons, see Article IV, section 13, Constitution of Nebraska.

A person convicted of first degree murder in Nebraska is not eligible for the death penalty unless the State proves one or more of the statutory aggravators beyond a reasonable doubt. State v. Gales, 265 Neb. 598, 658 N.W.2d 604 (2003).